Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Supreme Court Judgeships.

§ 23-15-991.
Term of office; elections.

The term of office of judges of the Supreme Court shall be eight (8) years. Concurrently with the regular election for representatives in Congress, held next preceding the expiration of the term of an incumbent, and likewise each eighth year thereafter, an election shall be held in the Supreme Court district from which such incumbent was elected at which there shall be elected a successor to the incumbent, whose term of office shall thereafter begin on the first Monday of January of the year in which the term of the incumbent he succeeds expires.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-239 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6850; 1930, § 6284; 1942, § 3313; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 297, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-993.
Each of judgeships deemed separate office; designation of positions for offices.

For the purpose of all elections, each of the nine (9) judgeships of the Supreme Court shall be considered a separate office. The three (3) offices in each of the three (3) Supreme Court districts shall be designated Position Number 1, Position Number 2 and Position Number 3, and in qualifying for office as a candidate for any office of judge of the Supreme Court each candidate shall state the position number of the office to which he aspires and the regular election ballots shall so indicate. In Supreme Court District Number 1: Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1966; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1965; and Position Number 3 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1969. In District Number 2: Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1972; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1969; and Position Number 3 shall be for that office for which the term ends in January, 1973. In District Number 3: Position Number 1 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1969; Position Number 2 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1969; and Position Number 3 shall be that office for which the term ends in January, 1965.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-241 [Codes, 1942, § 3313.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 244, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1964, ch. 361; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 31; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 298; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 94, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-994.
Elections for judge of Court of Appeals to be as prescribed in Section 9-4-1 et seq.

Elections for the office of judge of the Court of Appeals shall be as prescribed in Section 9-4-1, et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 157, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-995.
Applicability to election of general laws for election of state officers.

Except as may be otherwise provided by the provisions of Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985, the general laws for the election of state officers shall apply to and govern the election of judges of the Supreme Court.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-213 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 42; 1871, § 382; 1880, § 168; 1892, § 3702; 1906, § 4209; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6845; 1930, § 6271; 1942, § 3300; Laws, 1902, ch. 105; Laws, 1944, Ex ch. 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 229; Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 95, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-997.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 102, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this section).

[Derived from 1942 Code § 3149 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6429; 1930, § 5902; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; Repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; En Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 300, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]